Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Bail Bonds

431.510.
Prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of bail bondsman as defined in subsection (3) of this section, or to otherwise for compensation or other consideration:

Furnish bail or funds or property to serve as bail; or

Make bonds or enter into undertakings as surety;

for the appearance of persons charged with any criminal offense or violation of law or ordinance punishable by fine, imprisonment or death, before any of the courts of this state, including city courts, or to secure the payment of fines imposed and of costs assessed by such courts upon a final disposition.

Nothing contained herein shall serve to release any bail bondsman heretofore licensed by this state from the obligation of undischarged bail bond liability existing on June 19, 1976.

“Bail bondsman” shall mean any person, partnership, or corporation engaged for profit in the business of furnishing bail, making bonds or entering into undertakings, as surety, for the appearance of persons charged with any criminal offense or violation of law or ordinance punishable by fine, imprisonment, or death, before any of the courts of this state, or securing the payment of fines imposed and of costs assessed by such courts upon final disposition thereof, and the business of a bail bondsman shall be limited to the acts, transactions, and undertakings described in this subsection and to no other.

KRS

431.510

to

431.550

shall not be construed to limit or repeal KRS

431.021

or to prevent licensed insurers providing security required by Subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304 and nonprofit associations from posting or causing to be posted by licensed insurers security or acting as surety for their insureds or members for an offense arising from the operation of a motor vehicle, provided that such posting of security or acting as surety is merely incidental to the terms and conditions of an insurance contract or a membership agreement and provided further that no separate premium or charge therefor is required from the insureds or members.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 1; 2004, ch. 24, § 47, effective July 13, 2004.

431.515.
Pretrial release investigation and services — Provision of information on services and programs for combat veterans.

All trial courts in this Commonwealth having jurisdiction of criminal causes shall provide such pretrial release investigation and services as necessary to effectuate the purposes of KRS

431.510

to

431.550

, including KRS

431.518

, and, where practical, to assist in the earliest possible determination of:

Whether a person is a needy person under KRS Chapter 31; and

Whether a person has been in combat by asking the question, “Have you served in the National Guard or the United States Armed Forces and been in combat?” during the pretrial release investigation.

The Supreme Court may by appropriate rule or order establish and provide for such pretrial investigation and release services including, where practical, the taking of financial statements, and the court’s determination of whether a person is a needy person as provided in KRS

31.120

.

Pretrial officers shall give contact information on the Kentucky National Guard Family Services Program within the Kentucky Department of Military Affairs or similar programs which provide a full range of services for combat veterans to any person who states that he or she has been in combat, including an opportunity to call the program during the interview.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 24, § 5; 1978, ch. 27, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2009, ch. 96, § 2, effective March 24, 2009; 2010, ch. 145, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

There is nothing to prevent a pretrial release agency from interviewing a defendant under the custody of the arresting officer even if the defendant has never been turned over to the county jailer, thus, where requested in that situation, they should interview the defendant and make their recommendations to the trial court of jurisdiction.

OAG 80-318

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Farley, The Public Defender System, Vol. 41, No. 2, April 1977 Ky. Bench & B. 18.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Comment, A Constitutional Analysis of Kentucky’s Noncommercial Bail Bondsmen System, 4 N. Ky. L. Rev. 121 (1977).

431.517.
Authorization for home incarceration as a form of pretrial release — Court ordered participation of global positioning monitoring system — Costs.

Except as provided in this section, home incarceration may be ordered as a form of pretrial release, subject to the conditions imposed by the provisions of KRS

532.200

to

532.250

.

No defendant charged with an offense under KRS Chapter 507 may be released on home incarceration unless the court makes a finding that the defendant would not pose a threat to society.

A court ordering home incarceration as a form of pretrial release pursuant to this section may order the defendant to participate in a global positioning monitoring system program during all or part of the time of pretrial release through the use of a county-operated program pursuant to KRS

67.372

and

67.374

and not a program operated by the Department of Corrections pursuant to KRS

532.210

to

532.250

.

A court ordering global positioning monitoring system program participation for a defendant pursuant to this section shall:

Require the defendant to pay all or the part of the monitoring costs based on the sliding scale adopted by the Supreme Court of Kentucky as specified in KRS

403.761

and administrative costs for participating in the system;

Provide the monitoring system with a written or electronic copy of the conditions of release; and

Provide the monitoring system with a contact at the office of the circuit clerk, Commonwealth’s attorney, or county attorney, as appropriate, or pretrial release services for reporting violations of the monitoring order.

A person, county, or other organization may voluntarily agree to pay all or a portion of a defendant’s monitoring costs specified in KRS

403.761

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 170, § 11, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 115, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). Pursuant to 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 12, that Act shall be known as the Women’s Dignity in the Justice System Act. This statute was amended in Section 9 of that Act.

431.518.
Pretrial release of felony drug offender or felony offender with a history of substance abuse — Conditions.

When considering the pretrial release of a person charged with a felony offense under KRS Chapter 218A or a person charged with a felony offense whose criminal record indicates a history of recent and relevant substance abuse, the court considering the release shall cause the court’s pretrial release investigation and services office to have the person screened for recent and relevant substance abuse risk factors. A person’s refusal to participate in the screening shall not disqualify the person from being granted pretrial release. If this screening indicates the presence of recent and relevant substance abuse risk factors, the court may order as a condition of pretrial release that the person:

Undertake any testing ordered by the court under KRS

431.520

or

431.525

;

Participate in an additional assessment of the person’s condition;

Participate in a secular or faith-based treatment or recovery program if one (1) is identified as appropriate to the person as a result of the person’s initial assessment or an additional assessment performed under subsection (2) of this section;

Appear at any subsequent hearing ordered by the court where the person’s conditions of pretrial release may be reviewed and modified as the result of any testing performed under subsection (1) of this section, any additional assessment performed under subsection (2) of this section, any additional assessment of the defendant performed by a qualified mental health professional which the defendant may offer for the court’s consideration, or the person’s compliance with any treatment or recovery plan ordered by the court under subsection (3) of this section; and

Participate in a global positioning monitoring system program operated by a county pursuant to KRS

67.372

and

67.374

under the same terms and conditions as provided in KRS

431.517

, during all or part of the person’s period of release pursuant to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 96, § 3, effective March 24, 2009; 2010, ch. 170, § 12, effective July 15, 2010.

431.520.
Release on personal recognizance or unsecured bail bond — Conditions of release.

Any person charged with an offense shall be ordered released by a court of competent jurisdiction pending trial on his personal recognizance or upon the execution of an unsecured bail bond in an amount set by the court or as fixed by the Supreme Court as provided by KRS

431.540

, unless the court determines in the exercise of its discretion that such a release will not reasonably assure the appearance of the person as required, or the court determines the person is a flight risk or a danger to others. When such a determination is made, the court shall, either in lieu of or in addition to the above methods of release, impose any of the following conditions of release:

Place the person in the custody of a designated person or organization agreeing to supervise him;

Place restrictions on the travel, association, or place of abode of the person during the period of release;

Require the execution of a bail bond:

With sufficient personal surety or sureties acceptable to the court; in determining the sufficiency of such surety or sureties, the court shall consider his character, his place of residence, his relationship with the defendant, and his financial and employment circumstances; or

With the ten percent (10%) deposit as provided in KRS

431.530

; provided that if the defendant is permitted to earn credit toward bail pursuant to KRS

431.066

, that credit shall be applied to the ten percent (10%) deposit; or

With the deposit of cash equal to the amount of the bond or in lieu thereof acceptable security as provided in KRS

431.535

;

If the person’s record indicates a history of controlled substance or alcohol abuse:

Order the person to submit to periodic testing for use of controlled substances or alcohol and pay a reasonable fee, not to exceed the actual cost of the test and analysis, as determined by the court with the fee to be collected by the circuit clerk, held in an agency account, and disbursed, on court order, solely to the agency or agencies responsible for testing and analysis as compensation for the cost of the testing and analysis performed under this subsection. If the person is declared indigent, the testing fee may be waived by the court. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish pilot projects to implement the provisions of this subsection; or

Order the person to use an alcohol monitoring device, as defined in KRS

431.068

. All costs associated with the device, including administrative and operating costs, shall be paid by the defendant. If the court determines that the defendant is indigent, and a person, county, or other organization has not agreed to pay the costs for the defendant in an attempt to reduce incarceration expenses and increase public safety, the court shall consider other conditions of release provided for in this section;

During all or part of a person’s period of release pursuant to this section, order the person to participate in a global positioning monitoring system program operated by a county pursuant to KRS

67.372

and

67.374

under the same terms and conditions provided under KRS

431.517

.

If the person is charged with a sex crime as defined in KRS

17.500

, consider requiring that he or she be monitored electronically, and shall consider requiring the person be subject to home incarceration;

Impose any other condition deemed reasonably necessary to assure appearance as required, including a condition requiring that the person return to custody after specified hours;

A court authorizing the release of a person pursuant to this section shall cause the issuance of an appropriate order containing a statement of the conditions imposed, if any, shall cause such person to be informed of the penalties applicable to violations of the conditions of his release, and shall cause him to be informed that a warrant for his arrest will be issued immediately upon any such violation;

A person for whom conditions of release are imposed and who after twenty-four (24) hours from the time of the imposition of said conditions continues to be detained as a result of his inability to meet the conditions of release shall, upon written application or upon the court’s own motion, be entitled to have the conditions reviewed by the court which imposed them. A person who is ordered released on a condition which requires that he return to custody after specified hours shall, upon written application or upon the court’s own motion, be entitled to a review by the court which imposed the condition; or

If at any time following release of a defendant and before he is required to appear for trial, the court is advised of a material change in the defendant’s circumstances or that he has not complied with all conditions imposed upon his release, the court having jurisdiction may:

Order the arrest of the defendant;

Enter an order requiring the defendant, his surety or sureties to appear and show cause why the bail bond should not be forfeited or the conditions of his release be changed; or

Both.

A copy of said order shall be served upon the defendant, his surety or sureties. If the defendant fails to appear before the court as ordered or if, after hearing, the court finds the conditions of release have not been complied with, the court may change the conditions imposed or forfeit the bail bond or any portion thereof and enter a judgment for the Commonwealth against the defendant and his surety or sureties for the amount of the bail bond or any portion thereof and cost of the proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 3; 1998, ch. 606, § 32, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 182, § 25, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 170, § 13, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

431.523.
Bail for nonresidents charged with driving under the influence.

Bail for persons who are not residents of Kentucky who are charged with a violation of KRS

189A.010

shall be five hundred dollars ($500) unless the defendant was involved in a motor vehicle accident in which property damage or physical injury to a person was involved in which case bail shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). In the event of serious physical injury or death the minimum amount of bail shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000).

No court shall release a person charged with a violation of KRS

189A.010

who is not a resident of Kentucky without the imposition of bail as required by subsection (1) of this section. Bail in subsection (1) of this section shall be accepted in the full cash amount only, or with court approved surety for that amount, and no other form of bail shall be acceptable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 14, effective July 13, 1984.

431.525.
Conditions for establishing amount of bail — Pilot projects for controlled substance or alcohol abuse testing.

The amount of the bail shall be:

Sufficient to insure compliance with the conditions of release set by the court;

Not oppressive;

Commensurate with the nature of the offense charged;

Considerate of the past criminal acts and the reasonably anticipated conduct of the defendant if released; and

Considerate of the financial ability of the defendant.

When a person is charged with an offense punishable by fine only, the amount of the bail bond set shall not exceed the amount of the maximum penalty and costs.

When a person has been convicted of an offense and only a fine has been imposed, the amount of the bail shall not exceed the amount of the fine.

When a person has been charged with one (1) or more misdemeanors, the amount of the bail for all charges shall be encompassed by a single amount of bail that shall not exceed the amount of the fine and court costs for the one (1) highest misdemeanor charged. This subsection shall apply only to misdemeanor offenses not involving physical injury or sexual contact.

When a person has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense and a sentence of jail, probation, conditional discharge, or sentence other than a fine only has been imposed, the amount of bail for release on appeal shall not exceed double the amount of the maximum fine that could have been imposed for the one (1) highest misdemeanor offense for which the person was convicted. This subsection shall apply only to misdemeanors not involving physical injury or sexual contact.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a defendant who is found by the court to present a flight risk or to be a danger to others.

If a court determines that a defendant shall not be released pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the court shall document the reasons for denying the release in a written order.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish pilot projects to implement controlled substance or alcohol abuse testing as specified under this subsection. If the person’s record indicates a history of controlled substance or alcohol abuse, the court may order the person to submit to periodic testing for use of controlled substances or alcohol and to pay a reasonable fee, not to exceed the actual cost of the test and analysis, as determined by the court, with the fee to be collected by the circuit clerk, held in an agency account, and disbursed, on court order, solely to the agency or agencies responsible for testing and analysis as compensation for the cost of the testing and analysis performed under this subsection. If the person is declared indigent, the testing fee may be waived by the court. If the court finds the conditions of release have not been complied with, the court may change the conditions imposed or forfeit the bail bond or any portion thereof and enter a judgment for the Commonwealth against the person and his surety or sureties for the amount of the bail bond or any portion thereof and the cost of the proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 4; 1998, ch. 606, § 33, effective July 15, 1998; 2011, ch. 2, § 47, effective June 8, 2011.

431.530.
Deposit of bail security — Payments into public advocate special account — Return of deposit when innocent or charges dropped or dismissed.

Any person who has been permitted to execute a bail bond in accordance with KRS 431.520(3)(b) shall deposit with the clerk of the court before which the action is pending a sum of money equal to ten percent (10%) of the bail, but in no event shall such deposit be less than ten dollars ($10) unless the defendant earned full credit toward the applicable amount of bail pursuant to KRS

431.066

, in which case the defendant shall not be required to make a deposit with the clerk of the court.

Upon depositing said sum the defendant shall be released from custody subject to all conditions of release imposed by the court.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if the conditions of release have been performed and the defendant has been discharged from all obligations in the action the clerk of the court shall return to the defendant, unless the court orders otherwise, ninety percent (90%) of the sum deposited and shall retain as bail costs ten percent (10%) of the amount deposited; provided, however, in no event shall the amount retained by the clerk as bail costs be less than five dollars ($5). It is further provided that the court shall order the clerk of court to pay into the public advocate special account any amount of the sum deposited by the defendant, in excess of bail costs, which in its sound discretion represents a reasonable fee for any public advocate legal or investigative services provided for the defendant under KRS Chapter 31, but in no event shall the amount so paid to the public advocate special account as public advocate legal and investigative fees be less than five dollars ($5) per case. At the request of the defendant the court may order the amount repayable to defendant from such deposit to be paid to defendant’s attorney of record.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if a final judgment for a fine and court costs or either is entered in the prosecution of an action in which a deposit has been made in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the balance of such deposit, after deduction of bail costs and public advocate fees as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, shall be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment.

If the defendant has performed all conditions of release and if the defendant is found not guilty of the offense for which bail was posted, or if all charges against him relating to the offense for which bail was posted are dropped or dismissed, then all bail money deposited by the defendant or by another person on his behalf shall be returned to him with no deductions therefrom as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 24, § 6; 1978, ch. 384, § 118, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 9, effective July 1, 1979; 2012, ch. 156, § 3, effective July 12, 2012.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The “clerk of the court” as mentioned in this section is that person who is clerk to the county judge’s exercise of criminal jurisdiction. (Decision prior to repeal of KRS Ch. 25 which gave the county judge criminal jurisdiction.)

OAG 76-379

.

Local public defender organizations cannot gain access to the funds collected from indigent defendants pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by petitioning the Circuit and District Courts for an order requiring the court clerk to disperse such funds to local public defender programs.

OAG 78-564

.

Where a jailer takes a bail bond under KRS 30A.060(3) or RCr 4.24, since the jailer would be taking bond, if at all, as a substitution for the court clerk, who is not available, the fee or “cost” set forth in subsection (3) of this section would govern.

OAG 82-325

.

With regard to a clerk’s fee involving bonds, this section governs over KRS

64.005

as this section is the more specific statute.

OAG 82-325

.

A jailer may be authorized to bail misdemeanants by the Chief Circuit Judge, where the clerk is unavailable; he may accept cash bail or the deposit authorized by this section.

OAG 84-108

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Farley, The Public Defender System, Vol. 41, No. 2, April 1977 Ky. Bench & B. 18.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Comment, A Constitutional Analysis of Kentucky’s Noncommercial Bail Bondsmen System, 4 N. Ky. L. Rev. 121 (1977).

431.5305.
Jailer permitted to prepare or accept bail bond — Fee — Reporting.

With the approval of the fiscal court of the county in which the prisoner is incarcerated, the jailer may prepare or accept a bail bond pursuant to KRS 30A.060(3). In this case, he shall collect a fee of five dollars ($5) from the defendant. The jailer shall furnish the defendant with a written receipt for the fee. By the tenth day of each month, the jailer shall:

Report the previous month’s bonding fees to the county treasurer; and

Submit the previous month’s bonding fees to the county treasurer for inclusion in the jail fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 89, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

431.531.
Statement of collections to be filed — Funds to be sent to State Treasury — Certification of amounts and publication of annual audit by administrative office of the courts.

Each Circuit Court clerk, shall on the first day of each month, send to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, a statement, subscribed and sworn to by him, showing the amount of money received or collected by or for him the preceding month pursuant to KRS 431.530(3) and shall, with such statements, send to the State Treasury the amount so collected for deposit to the credit of the general fund.

The Circuit Court clerk shall send to the State Treasury for credit to the general fund all balances from fees collected pursuant to KRS

431.530

.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall certify to the Finance and Administration Cabinet on an annual basis that all funds collected have been duly reported by the circuit clerk in accordance with KRS

30A.120

.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall cause to be published an annual audit of the funds collected pursuant to KRS

30A.120

no later than December 1 for the preceding fiscal year receipts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 26, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A jailer, taking bond under direction of the court, is really an officer of the court, and the costs or fees therefor accrue to the accounts of the circuit clerk’s office, subject to their being sent to the state treasury for credit to the general fund, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

OAG 82-325

.

431.532.
Bail deposits by person other than defendant.

When deposits of money are made by a person other than the defendant utilizing funds other than those of the defendant as bail security pursuant to KRS

431.530

the following terms and conditions shall apply in lieu of the provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of KRS

431.530

:

The deposit shall be listed as being made on behalf of the defendant by the depositor and not in the name of the defendant;

If the conditions of release have been performed and the defendant has been discharged from all obligations in the action the clerk of the court shall return to the person who deposited the money ninety percent (90%) of the sum deposited and shall retain as bail costs ten percent (10%) of the amount deposited provided, however, in no event shall the amount retained by the clerk as bail costs be less than five dollars ($5);

No deductions shall be made by the court for public advocate services, satisfaction of fines, payment of attorneys, or any other purpose when the defendant has been discharged as provided in subsection (2) of this section unless agreed to by the poster of the bond.

If the defendant has performed all conditions of release and if the defendant is found not guilty of the offense for which bail was posted, or if all charges against him relating to the offense for which bail was posted are dropped or dismissed, then all bail money deposited pursuant to this section shall be returned to the person posting the bail with no deductions therefrom as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of KRS

431.530

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 10, effective July 1, 1979.

431.535.
Cash, stocks, bonds, or real estate as security for bail.

Any person who has been permitted to execute a bail bond in accordance with KRS 431.520(3)(c) may secure such bond:

By a deposit, with the clerk of the court, of cash, or stocks and bonds in which trustees are authorized to invest funds under the laws of this Commonwealth having an unencumbered market value of not less than the amount of the bail bond; or

By real estate situated in this Commonwealth with unencumbered equity, not exempt and owned by the defendant or a surety or sureties having a fair market value at least double the amount of the bail bond.

If the bail bond is secured by stocks and bonds the defendant or the surety or sureties shall file with the bond a sworn schedule which shall be approved by the court and shall contain:

A list of the stocks and bonds deposited describing each in sufficient detail that they may be identified;

The present market value of each stock and bond;

The total market value of the stocks and bonds listed;

A statement that the affiant or affiants is the sole owner or owners thereof and that the stocks and bonds listed are not exempt from execution;

A statement that such stocks and bonds have not previously been deposited or accepted as bail in this Commonwealth during the 12 months preceding the date of the bail bond; provided however this statement shall not be required of the defendant using his own property as security; or if the surety or sureties using their property as security are related to the defendant by consanguinity no further removed than first cousin; or if the surety or sureties is either a father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, or daughter-in-law of the defendant; and

A statement that such stocks and bonds are security for the appearance of the defendant in accordance with the conditions of release imposed by the court.

If the bail bond is secured by real estate the defendant or surety or sureties shall file with the bond a sworn schedule which shall contain:

A legal description of the real estate;

A description of any and all encumbrances on the real estate including the amount of each and the holder thereof;

The market value of the unencumbered equity owned by the affiant or affiants;

A statement that the affiant is the sole owner, or in the case of jointly owned real estate, that affiants are the sole owners of such unencumbered equity and that it is not exempt from execution;

A statement that the real estate has not previously been used or accepted as bail in this Commonwealth during the 12 months preceding the date of the bail bond; provided however, this statement shall not be required of the defendant using his own property as security; or if the surety or sureties using their property as security are related to the defendant by consanguinity no further removed than first cousin; or if the surety or sureties is either a father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law or daughter-in-law of the defendant; and

A statement that the real estate is security for the appearance of the defendant in accordance with the conditions of release imposed by the court.

The sworn schedule shall constitute a material part of the bail bond. An affiant shall be subject to penalty of perjury if in the sworn schedule he makes a false statement which he does not believe to be true.

A certified copy of the bail bond and schedule of real estate accompanied by the necessary recording fee which shall be paid by the affiant or affiants shall be filed immediately by the clerk of the court requiring the bail bond in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the real estate is situated. The county clerk shall record such copies of said bail bonds and schedule and the Commonwealth shall have a lien upon such real estate from the date and time of such recordation. The instruments described herein shall be recorded in the miscellaneous encumbrances book provided by the county clerk.

If the conditions of release imposed by the court have been performed and the defendant has been discharged from all obligations in the action, the clerk of the court shall return to him or his sureties the deposit of any cash, stocks or bonds. If the bail bond has been secured by real estate, the clerk of the court requiring the bail bond shall forthwith notify in writing the county clerk of the county where the real estate is situated and the lien on the real estate shall be discharged and the release thereof recorded in the margin.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 6; 1978, ch. 384, § 530, effective June 17, 1978.

431.540.
Uniform schedule of amounts of bail in designated nonviolent Class D felonies, misdemeanors, and violations.

The Supreme Court may by rule or order prescribe a uniform schedule of amounts of bail in designated nonviolent Class D felonies, misdemeanors, and violations;

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when the amount of bail is fixed by such rule or order of the Supreme Court for a particular offense, the clerk of the court or other public officers so authorized by the court’s order shall accept cash bail in the prescribed amount or the deposit authorized by KRS

431.530

and release the defendant to appear in accordance with the conditions of the bail bond. A receipt shall be delivered to the defendant for the bail so taken and within a reasonable time such bail shall be deposited with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the offense.

A court may, in the exercise of its reasonable discretion, refuse to set bail in the amount prescribed by such rule or order of the Supreme Court, but, in so doing, the court must set forth in writing its reasons for such refusal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 7; 2008, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Pursuant to RCr 4.24, the jailer or the deputy jailer cannot accept bail except where the Circuit Court of proper jurisdiction so directs, and if the deputy jailer takes bail money when not authorized to do so the jailer is liable on his bond for any loss of money.

OAG 76-516

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Comment, A Constitutional Analysis of Kentucky’s Noncommercial Bail Bondsmen System, 4 N. Ky. L. Rev. 121 (1977).

431.545.
Forfeiture of bail; Prosecution.

If a defendant shall willfully fail to appear or shall willfully fail to comply with the conditions of his release:

The court may order a forfeiture of the bail, serving a copy thereof upon the defendant and his surety or sureties at their last known addresses; if the defendant or his surety or sureties do not appear within twenty (20) days after service of the order or a return of not found and satisfy the court that appearance or compliance by the defendant was impossible and without his fault, the court may enter judgment against the defendant and his surety or sureties for the amount of the bail and the costs of the proceedings for all of which execution may issue; and

The defendant shall be subject to prosecution for the offenses prescribed in KRS

520.070

and

520.080

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 8.

431.550.
Penalty for KRS 431.510 to 431.545.

Any person who violates any provisions of KRS

431.510

to

431.545

not otherwise punishable by law or statute shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense, and guilty of a Class D felony for each additional offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 2, § 9.